Illinois, session 104th, SB2272.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Section 45-85 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/45-85 new)7    Sec. 45-85. Employment social enterprises.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that employment social 9enterprises are mission-driven businesses that provide 10employment opportunities and supportive services to 11individuals facing significant barriers to employment, 12including those impacted by incarceration, homelessness, or 13disabilities. The General Assembly also finds that employment 14social enterprises foster economic inclusion, reduce 15recidivism, and strengthen local economies by reinvesting 16their profits into workforce development and community support 17initiatives. The General Assembly also finds that promoting 18employment social enterprises aligns with this State's 19commitment to innovation, workforce equity, and economic 20resilience.21    (b) As used in this Section, "employment social 22enterprise" means a non-profit or for-profit entity that 23provides services or produces or assembles goods and   SB2272- 2 -LRB104 12169 SPS 22270 b1demonstrates a mission to provide employment and social 2supports, including on-the-job training and life skills 3training, to employees who are individuals with a barrier to 4employment. The chief procurement officer shall establish a 5detailed definition by rule.6    (c) Each chief procurement officer has the authority to 7designate as employment social enterprises set-asides a fair 8proportion of construction, supply, and service contracts for 9award to employment social enterprises in this State. 10Advertisements for bids or offers for those contracts shall 11specify designation as employment social enterprises 12set-asides. In awarding the contracts, only bids or offers 13from qualified employment social enterprises shall be 14considered.15    (d) For the purpose of subsection (c), for executive State 16agencies, a fair proportion of construction contracts shall be 17no less than 25% nor more than 40% of the annual total 18contracts for construction.19    (e) An employment social enterprises set-aside designation 20may be withdrawn by the purchasing agency when deemed in the 21best interests of this State. Upon withdrawal, all bids or 22offers shall be rejected, and the bidders or offerors shall be 23notified of the reason for rejection. The contract shall then 24be awarded in accordance with this Code without the 25designation of an employment social enterprises set-aside.26    (f) By November 1 of each year, each chief procurement   SB2272- 3 -LRB104 12169 SPS 22270 b1officer shall report to the Commission on Equity and Inclusion 2on the following for the immediately preceding fiscal year, 3and by March 1 of each year, the Commission on Equity and 4Inclusion shall compile and report that information to the 5General Assembly:6        (1) the total number of employment social enterprises 7    and the number of employment social enterprises that 8    submitted bids for contracts under this Code; and9        (2) the total number of employment social enterprises, 10    the number of employment social enterprises that entered 11    into contracts under this Code, and the total value of 12    those contracts.